District of Columbia statutes.
16-3544

Pleading; jury trial.

In a quo warranto proceeding, the defendant may demur, plead specially, or plead “not guilty” as the general issue, and the United States or the District of Columbia, as the case may be, may reply as in other actions of a civil character. Issues of fact shall be tried by a jury if either party requests it. Otherwise they shall be determined by the court.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 603, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 563, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3544.
1973 Ed., § 16-3544.